sinhala_morp.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
    +N      ! Noun tag
    +Sg     ! Singular
    +Pl     ! Plural

LEXICON Root
    Nouns ;

! Sinhala Nouns
LEXICON Nouns
ගස       N ;  ! Tree
පොත      N ;  ! Book
මල       N ;  ! Flower
පැන්සල   N ;  ! Pencil

! Noun processing (modified to hide stem marker)
LEXICON N
+N:0    Num ;  ! Changed from ^ to 0 to prevent marker display

! Pluralization rules
LEXICON Num
+Sg:0   # ;    ! Singular form
+Pl:්   # ;    ! Plural form (hal kirīma)
        # ;    ! Alternative form

END
